sk-SK: Materiál cievky: Hliník; Uhlík; Duralový materiál; Grafit; Magnézium; Plast; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Iné
pt-BR: Material do carretel: Alumínio; Carbono; Duralumin; Grafite; Magnésio; Plástico; Aço inoxidável; Outro
hr-HR: Materijal kotura: Aluminij; Ugljik; Duraluminij; Grafit; Magnezij; Plastika; Nehrđajući čelik; Ostalo
de: Spulenmaterial: Aluminium; Kohlenstoff; Duralumin; Graphit; Magnesium; Kunststoff; Edelstahl; Sonstiges
hu: Orsódob anyaga: Alumínium; Szén; Dúralumínium; Grafit; Magnézium; Műanyag; Rozsdamentes acél; Egyéb
bg-BG: Материал на макарата: Алуминий; Въглерод; Дуралуминий; Графит; Магнезий; Пластмаса; Неръждаема стомана; Други
zh-CN: 线轴材质: 铝; 碳; Duralumin; 石墨; 镁; 塑料; 不锈钢; 其他
th: วัสดุสำหรับสปูล: อะลูมิเนียม; คาร์บอน; Duralumin; แกรไฟท์; แมกนีเซียม; พลาสติก; เหล็กสเตนเลส; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 線軸材料: 鋁; 碳; Duralumin; 石墨; 鎂; 塑膠; 不銹鋼; 其他
it: Materiale della bobina: Alluminio; Carbonio; Duralluminio; Grafite; Magnesio; Plastica; Acciaio inossidabile; Altro
pt-PT: Material do carretel: Alumínio; Carbono; Duralumínio; Grafite; Magnésio; Plástico; Aço inoxidável; Outro
da: Spolemateriale: Aluminum; Kulstof; Duralumin; Grafit; Magnesium; Plast; Rustfrit stål; Andet
nb: Spolemateriale: Aluminium; Karbon; Duralumin; Grafitt; Magnesium; Plast; Rustfritt stål; Annet
cs: Materiál cívky: Hliník; Uhlík; Duralumin; Grafit; Hořčík; Plast; Nerezová ocel; Jiné
pl: Materiał szpuli: Aluminium; Węgiel; Duraluminium; Grafit; Magnez; Tworzywo sztuczne; Stal nierdzewna; Inne
ja: スプール素材: アルミニウム; カーボン; Duralumin; グラファイト; マグネシウム; プラスチック; ステンレススチール; その他
sl-SI: Material koluta: Aluminij; Ogljik; Duraluminij; Grafit; Magnezij; Plastika; Nerjavno jeklo; Drugo
vi: Chất liệu ống chỉ: Nhôm; Cacbon; Duralumin; Than chì; Magiê; Nhựa; Thép không gỉ; Khác
sv: Spolmaterial: Aluminium; Kol; Duralumin; Grafit; Magnesium; Plast; Rostfritt stål; Övrigt
ro-RO: Material bobină: Aluminiu; Carbon; Duraluminiu; Grafit; Magneziu; Plastic; Oțel inoxidabil; Altele
ko: 스풀 소재: 알루미늄; 탄소; Duralumin; 흑연; 마그네슘; 플라스틱; 스테인리스 스틸; 기타
ru: Материал шпули: Алюминий; Углерод; Дюралюминий; Графит; Магний; Пластик; Нержавеющая сталь; Другое
en: Spool material: Aluminum; Carbon; Duralumin; Graphite; Magnesium; Plastic; Stainless steel; Other
fi: Kelan materiaali: Alumiini; Hiili; Duralumiini; Grafiitti; Magnesium; Muovi; Ruostumaton teräs; Muu
lt-LT: Būgnelio medžiaga: Aliuminis; Anglis; Duraliuminis; Grafitas; Magnis; Plastikas; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Kita
fr: Matériau de la bobine: Aluminum; Carbone; Duralumin; Graphite; Magnésium; Plastique; Acier inoxydable; Autre
el: Υλικό μασουριού: Αλουμίνιο; Άνθρακας; Ντουραλουμίνιο; Γραφίτης; Μαγνήσιο; Πλαστικό; Ανοξείδωτος χάλυβας; Άλλο
tr: Makara malzemesi: Alüminyum; Karbon; Duralumin; Grafit; Magnezyum; Plastik; Paslanmaz çelik; Diğer
es: Material del carrete: Aluminio; Carbón; Duraluminio; Grafito; Magnesio; Plástico; Acero inoxidable; Otros
nl: Spoelmateriaal: Aluminium; Koolstof; Duralumin; Grafiet; Magnesium; Plastic; Roestvrij staal; Andere